Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,126
Division; budget estimates; federal funds; authority to comply with requirements.

Budget estimates of the amounts of appropriations needed each biennium for vocational rehabilitation services and for the administration of such program shall be submitted as provided by law, and sufficient funds for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 79-11,121 to 79-11,132 shall be appropriated by the Legislature. In the event federal funds are available to the State of Nebraska for vocational rehabilitation purposes, the Division of Rehabilitation Services is authorized to comply with such requirements as may be necessary to obtain the maximum amount of federal funds and the most advantageous proportion possible insofar as this may be done without violating other provisions of the state laws and Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1955, c. 324, § 6, p. 1004;

Laws 1986, LB 258, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1451;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 908.